Hawaii statutes.
[§667-100] Conveyance of property on
payment of purchase price; distribution of sale proceeds. (a) After the
purchaser completes the purchase by paying the full purchase price and the
costs for the purchase, the unit shall be conveyed to the purchaser by a
conveyance document. The conveyance document shall be in a recordable form and
shall be signed by the association in the association's name. The unit owner
shall not be required to sign the conveyance document.

(b) From the sale proceeds, after paying in
the following order:

(1) The
association's attorney's fees and costs;

(2) The fees and
costs of the power of sale foreclosure;

(3) The moneys
owed to the association; and

(4) All other
liens and encumbrances in the order of priority as a matter
of law,

the balance of the sale proceeds
shall be distributed by the association to junior creditors having valid liens
on the unit in the order of their priority and not pro rata. Any remaining
surplus after payment in full of all valid lien creditors shall be distributed
to the unit owner.

(c) Lien creditors prior to the association
shall not be forced to their right of recovery. However, the association and
any prior lien creditor may agree in writing that the proceeds from the sale
will be distributed by the association to the prior lien creditor towards the
payment of moneys owed to the prior lien creditor before any moneys are paid to
the association. [L 2012, c 182, pt of §3(2)]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next